Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1153.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2116c. (1) An automobile insurer shall not require a named insured to disclose the addition of resident relatives to the named insured's household during the term of the automobile insurance policy and shall not cancel or rescind a policy, deny a claim, or otherwise take any other action detrimental to coverage solely due to the named insured's failure to disclose a resident relative who joined the named insured's household during the term of the automobile insurance policy. (2) An automobile insurer shall not require an applicant at the time of application or named insured at the time of renewal to disclose resident relatives unless all of the following apply: (a) The insurer requires disclosure of resident relatives only in the application for automobile insurance or at renewal. (b) The insurer defines in the application which individuals are considered resident relatives under the terms of the policy in a conspicuous manner. (c) At renewal, the insurer must notify the named insured in a conspicuous manner that all resident relatives are required to be disclosed. If the disclosure is to include minors or nondrivers, the insurer's notice must contain an explicit statement to that effect.